Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Judicial Department, for  the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Judicial compensation............... $ 95,761,823
(2) Operations................................. $390,601,871
(3) Mandated payments .................. $ 17,819,193
(4) State court technology
systems ..................................... $ 8,105,672
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 31,438,952
(6) Third-party debt
collection................................... $ 15,970,809
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding reimbursements from  federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in this section, collected  or received by the Judicial Department
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 20,626,120
(2) Mandated payments .................. $ 711,771
(3) State Court Facilities and
Security Account ...................... $ 8,155,362
(4) State Court Technology Fund ... $ 17,987,058
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,476,446 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2021
Act collected or received by the Judicial Department.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $334,221 for payment of expenses of the Oregon Law Commission.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $53,934 for payment of expenses of the Council on Court Procedures.
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $7,492,047  for the purpose of providing conciliation and mediation
services in circuit courts.
(2) The  Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated un-
der this section to the counties  of this state to fund conciliation and mediation services in
circuit courts. The Chief Justice shall consult with  the presiding judges of the circuit courts
before making the distributions.
SECTION 7. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $7,492,047 for  the purpose of operating law libraries or providing
law library services.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute the moneys appropriated  un-
der this section to  the counties of this state based on revenues received from filing fees
collected during the biennium ending June 30, 2021, in civil actions commenced in the circuit
court for the county.
SECTION 8. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $12,784,050 for  the purpose of funding the Legal Services Program
described in ORS 9.572.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall distribute all moneys appropriated under
this section to the Oregon State Bar in eight quarterly installments of equal amount.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for operations, is decreased by $750,000.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (6), chapter 691,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for third-party debt collection, is increased by $750,000.
SECTION 11. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5012 (HB 5012-A) Page 3